Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1901
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature through sections 48-1901 to 48-1910 to help in the treatment and elimination of drug and alcohol use and abuse in the workplace while protecting the employee's rights. Nothing in sections 48-1901 to 48-1910 shall be construed to require employers to conduct drug and alcohol testing of their employees nor shall sections 48-1901 to 48-1910 be determinative of the cases or circumstances under which such tests may be given.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 1.